Hawaii statutes.
PART
XXVIII. INFANTS AND TODDLERS

Cross References

Safe place for newborns, see chapter 587D.

Shaken baby syndrome (prevention), see §321-33.

[§321-351] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Biological risk" means prenatal,
perinatal, neonatal, or early developmental events suggestive of biological
insults to the developing central nervous system which increase the probability
of delayed development.

"Case management" means an ongoing
service of shared responsibility between families and professionals that
identifies needs and assists in obtaining coordinated, appropriate services and
resources.

"Delayed development" means a
significant delay in one or more of the following areas of development:
cognition, speech, language, physical, motor, vision, hearing, psychosocial, or
self-help skills.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Director" means the director of
health.

"Early intervention services" means
services which:

(1) Are provided under public supervision;

(2) Are provided at no cost, except where federal or
state law provides for a system of payments by families, including a sliding
fee schedule;

(3) Are designed to meet the developmental needs of
infants and toddlers with special needs, which include but are not limited to
physical development, cognitive development, and self-help skills;

(4) Are provided by qualified professional and
paraprofessional personnel;

(5) Are provided in conformity with an individualized
family support plan; and

(6) Include but are not limited to: family support,
counseling, and home visits; special instruction; speech pathology and
audiology; occupational therapy; physical therapy; psychological services; case
management services; medical services only for diagnostic or evaluation
purposes; early identification, screening, and assessment services; and health
services necessary to enable the infant or toddler to benefit from the other
early intervention services.

"Environmental risk" means physical,
social, or economic factors which may limit development. Environmental risk
includes, but is not limited to the following conditions:

(1) Birthweight between 1,500 and 2,500 grams, in
combination with any other environmental risk factor;

(2) Parental age less than sixteen;

(3) Parental age between sixteen and eighteen and
less than a high school education in combination with any other environmental
risk factor;

(4) Any existing physical, developmental, emotional,
or psychiatric disability in a primary caregiver;

(5) Presence of physical, developmental, emotional,
or psychiatric disability in a sibling or any other family member in the home
in combination with any other environmental risk factor;

(6) Abuse of any legal or illegal substance by a
primary caregiver;

(7) Child abuse and neglect of target child or
siblings;

(8) Economically disadvantaged family in combination
with any other environmental risk factor;

(9) Single parent in combination with any other
environmental risk factor; and

(10) Incarceration of a primary caregiver in
combination with any other environmental risk factor.

"Individual family support plan"
means a dynamic, voluntary plan of action and support developed by families and
professionals that emanates from the families' expressions of needs and goals.

"Infants and toddlers with special
needs" means infants and toddlers from birth to the age of three with
delayed development, biological risk, or environmental risk. [L 1989, c 107, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next